Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-202 Court's seizure order.
(a) The commissioner may file in the circuit court of the first judicial
circuit of this State a petition alleging, with respect to a domestic insurer:

(1) That there exist any grounds that would justify a
court order for a formal delinquency proceeding against an insurer under
section 431:15-301 or section 431:15-306;

(2) That the interests of policyholders, creditors or
the public will be endangered by delay; and

(3) The contents of an order deemed necessary by the
commissioner.

(b) Upon a filing under subsection (a), the
court may issue forthwith, ex parte and without a hearing, the requested order
which shall direct the commissioner to take possession and control of all or a
part of the property, books, accounts, documents, and other records of the
insurer, and of the premises occupied by it for transaction of its business,
and until further order of the court, enjoin the insurer and its officers,
managers, agents, and employees from disposition of its property and from
transaction of its business except with the written consent of the
commissioner.

(c) The court shall specify in the order what
its duration shall be, which shall be the time as the court deems necessary for
the commissioner to ascertain the condition of the insurer. On motion of
either party or on its own motion, the court from time to time may hold such
hearings as it deems desirable after such notice as it deems appropriate, and
may extend, shorten or modify the terms of the seizure order. The court shall
vacate the seizure order if the commissioner fails to commence a formal
proceeding under section 431:15-301 or section 431:15-306 after having had a
reasonable opportunity to do so. An order of the court pursuant to a formal
proceeding under section 431:15-301 or section 431:15-306 shall vacate the
seizure order.

(d) Entry of a seizure order under this
section shall not constitute an anticipatory breach of any contract of the
insurer.

(e) An insurer subject to an ex parte order
under this section may petition the court at any time after the issuance of the
order for a hearing and review of the order. The court shall hold the hearing
and review not more than fifteen days after the request. A hearing under this
subsection may be held privately in chambers and it shall be so held if the
insurer proceeded against so requests.

(f) If, at any time after the issuance of an
order, it appears to the court that any person whose interest is or will be
substantially affected by the order did not appear at the hearing and has not
been served, the court may order that notice be given. An order that notice be
given shall stay the effect of an order previously issued by the court. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next